Utah statutes.
62A-5-208.   Powers and duties of superintendent.

The chief administrative officer of the developmental center is the superintendent, and has the following powers and duties:

(1)  to manage the developmental center and administer the division's rules governing the developmental center;

(2)  to hire, control, and remove all employees, and to fix their compensation according to state law; and

(3)  with the approval of the division, to make any expenditures necessary in the performance of his duties.



Amended by Chapter 207, 1991 General Session

